ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/uk_UA/hyph_uk_UA.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.а2зі
.а4са
.ас1те
.ас1п
.а2л
.ан1ти3
.а2нт
.антич2
.а2ні
.а4ва
.а2ве
.а2ро
.аре3што
.а1ре
.а1ри2
.а2га
.а1г
.а2го
.а3г1л
.а2м
.а2д
.а2й
.а2п
.б2
.з2
.залежно3с
.1за1
.за1ле
.зале2ж1н
.залеж1но
.зна3ч4не
.зна1ч
.зна2ч1н
.зва1но3
.звичайно3ю
.з2вич
.з1ви
.зви1ча
.звичай1н
.звичай1но
.зір1в
.1зі
.з4гн
.зг2
.з’2
.ц2
.с2
.с4ль
.сут1но2
.с2у
.су2т1н
.сутно1с3
.су1дж
.о2
.об1р
.обі1з
.о3бізнаніс
.обізна1ні
.оз1н
.ос1л
.ос3та
.ос1то
.ос3тра
.ост3рова.
.остро1ва
.ос3трі
.ос1те
.о3сві2т1н
.ос1п
.олі2я
.о1л
.от1р
.о3р2н
.ог1л
.о1г
.ожи1
.о3к2с
.ок3ре1ма
.одно3ї
.о2д1н
.од1но
.од1в
.о3п2ц
.опози1ці3
.о1по1
.о3поз
.опо1зи
.о3пт
.оп1р
.опу1с
.ле1с
.лек1ці2
.ле2к1ц
.2ль2
.ляг1л
.юс1
.ю2но
.т2
.твор1чос3
.твор1ч
.тряс3ти.
.три1с
.тис1к2
.нагоро1до3
.на1г
.наго1ро
.на3й2шл
.но1во1
.1но
.не1д
.1не
.в2
.ва1го3ю
.ва1г
.ві1лл
.віт1р
.віда3н2
.ві3да
.ве1ст
.р2
.ро4с3ту.
.ро1ст
.ро2л1л
.ро1л
.ро1д
.різ1но3
.річ1но3
.рі2ч1н
.рес1т
.і4зо
.іс1
.і2о1на
.і1о
.і2л
.іл1л
.і2на
.і2но
.і2в
.і2ро
.і2м
.і2д
.і2ш
.їс1ти
.г2
.гу3ста
.ге1ні2
.1ге
.у2
.ус3тах
.у4нік
.у3ні
.ес1
.е2те
.е2тич
.2е1ти
.е2г
.е2ме
.я2л
.я2м
.я2ка
.які2
.я1кі1с3т2ю
.я2ку
.ж2
.жи3в1ле
.жив1л
.форма1ці3
.фор1м
.фор1ма
.форма1ц
.м2
.морсь3ка
.1мо
.мо2р1с
.мо2г1л
.мо1г
.мі3сто
.мі3сту
.мі4стит
.мі1сти
.міс3ти1ти
.мі4стив
.міс3ти2в.
.к2
.ко3сті
.коли3шньо1г
.ко1л
.ко1лиш
.колиш1нь2о1
.коли2ш1н
.коли3шнє
.крас3т
.д2
.ді1с
.1ді
.діяль1но3
.ді1я
.дія1л
.дія2ль
.діяль1н
.дій3с4ни2м.
.дійс1н
.дійс1ни
.ді3йш4ла
.дій2ш1л
.3дис1
.1ди
.ди1в1л
.хре3сті
.1хр
.є2в
.єврей3
.єв1р
.єм1но1
.1єм
.єм1н
.єпи1
.й2
.й2ш1л
.п2
.пас3ти
.позиці3ю
.по1
.3поз
.по1зи
.пози1ці
.по1ї2л
.пошко3
.по1ш
.при1й2
.пі3зна
.пі2в3д2
.пу1с
.пере3д4н
.пе1ре
.ш2
.час3ті.
.ча3стіш
.ча3сти
.ща1
.1щ
а1а
аа4ре
а1б
азо2в2н
а1зо
аз1л
аз1ва
аз1во
аз1віт
аз1вут
аз1вет
азі1ю
а1зі
а1зя
азко1ю
аз1к
аз1д
а1ц
аці3є
а1ці
а4ць.
а2ць1
ас1ло
ас2ле
ас1та.
а1стою
ас1тот
асто1то3
ас1тор
а1стом
ас3то2к.
а1ств
а1стр
ас3ті1ша
ас1т2е.
ас1тях
ас1тим
а4с1тий2
а1с2у
асу1д
а1се
ась1
асько1
а1с2м
а1ска.
аск2
ас1кав
а1ску
а1ски
ас3х
ас1пе
а1о
ао2щ
а1ла
алаш3то
ала3шту
а1ло
ало1гі2
ало1г
а2л1л
а3л2ю
а1лі
аліза1ці3
алі1за1
аліза1ц
аліс3та
алі1ю
аліє1
алійсько3
алій1сь
а1лу
а1ле
а3ль2о
а2ль
аль1шо1
аль1ш
а1ля
а1ли
а1юс
а1ю1ч
а1т
ата1ці1
а1та1ц
атсько3
а2т1с
ато3с
аторі3ю
ато3рі
ато1ї
ато1ко1
атно1ї
а2т1н
ат1но
ат1ві
а1ті1ї
атур1но3
ату2р1н
атис1т
ати1но1
ати1во1
атко1во3
а2т1к
а1на
ана2с
а2нар
анці1ю
а2н1ц
ан1ці
анціє1
ансі2я
а2н1с
ан1сі
ано1с
а1но
а2н1н
анно1с
ан1но
ані1ю
а1ні
а3нім
а2нь
а1ва
а2в3з2
а2в1с
а1во
аво2д1ж
ав1л
а2в1т
авно1ю
а2в1н
ав1но
авно1ї
авни1ц
ав1ни
ав1ра
ав1ро
ав1ри
а1ві
аві2д
аві1д1у
а2в1г
а1ву
а1ве
аве1ст
а2вж
ав3м
ави3ч2
а1ви
ав1к
ав4ко1л
авколи3ш1ні
авко1лиш
авколи2ш1н
а2в1д
а1впа
ав1по1
а1впр
ав1пі
а1вча
а2в1чан
ав1чо1
а1вчі
а1вчит
а1в’
а1ра
ара1ці2
ара3ц
арсько3ї
а2р1с
а1ро
аро1ї
арод1ж
арт1но1
а2рт
ар2т1н
ар1ва
а1рі
а1ру
а1ре
аре1но1
аре1ї
а1ря
а1ри
арис3та
ари1с3то
арко1ю
ар1к
а1рє
а1ї
а2ї.
а1г
аго1с
а2г1л
а2г1в
агі2я
а1гі
агу1
а1у
ау2в
ау1р
ауко1ю
ау1ко
а1е1
а1я
а1жо
ажно1с
а2ж1н
аж1но
а1жу
а1же
а1жи
ажко1
аж1к
а1фо
аф1р
а3фіс1
а1фі
а3ма
ам1с
а3мо1с
а1мо
а1мі
а3мі1но
а1ме
ампа1ні3
ам1п
а1ка
акці1ю
а2к1ц
ак1ці
а1ко
акомпані3ї
аком1п
акомпа1ні
а1кл
ак1в
ак1рів
а1кре
а1кі
а1ку
а1ке
а1ки
ад1б
ад1з2
а3до
адо1во1
адно2с1
а2д1н
ад1но
ад1нь2о1
ад1рах
а3дрі
ад3рукова1ні
адру1ко
адруко1ва
адіс1л
а1ді
а3де
адь1к
а1дя
а1джу.
а3дження.
аджен1н
аджен1ня
ад3женням
ад3же1ні
а1хо
ах1т
а1х1р
ахідно3ю
а1хі
ахі2д1н
ахід1но
ах3м
а1хи
а1є1в
айсько3
ай1сь
а2й1ос
а1йо
а2й3т
айно1с
ай1н
ай1но
ай1ме
ай1де
айд2
а1йш4ла
ай2шл
а1п
а3па
апас1т
а2п2с
а3по1л
апо1
аполя1
аповнен4
апо2в1н
апов1не
а2п1т
апро1ва3
апро1
а1пі1ї
апус3ку
апуск2
а2ш1л
а3штова1но
ашто1ва
аш1тую
а3штувал
ашту1в
аш3тува1т
аш3тува2в.
аш1тує
аши1ф
а1ши
а2ш1к
а1ч
а3ч2на
а2ч1н
а3ч2ній
ач1ні
ач4них
ач1ни
а3ч2ний2
2б.
ба1зо1
бас1к2
1баною
ба1но
ба1ні1
бава1рі3
ба1ва
ба1д
баш1
1ба1ч
2б1з
б1ц
2б1с
бсько1
1бо.
бо1ст
4болон1к
бо1л
бо3ло
1бою
1бот
бо1та
бо1тя
1бон
3бо1вя
3боро1на
бо1ро
3борон3н
3боро1ні
бо1ї1с
1бок
1бод
1бо1ч
бочо1
бл2
б1лас
блас1но3
блас1н
б1лад
б1лаш1
блі2я.
блі1я
б2лук
1бле
3блеї
б1ле1я
1бля
бливо2с3
бли1во
бливо3ї
бли1ві2
бливі1с3т2ю
б1лич
б3л1д
б2ю
2б1т
2б1н
бно3сті
б1но
3б2нос3те
бни1ц
б1ни
2б1в
б3ра1з1л
бра1зн
1бра1жу1
3браже1на
бра1же
3браженням
бражен1н
бражен1ня
3браже1ні
3бражень
3браже1ни
б1рах
4броєн1н
бро1є
бро1єн
2броє1ни
б1ру1ш
брей2сь3ка
брей1сь
1бри
брис1
1бі.
3біцян1к
бі1ця
1бі1о
бі4лос
бі1ло
біл1л
1біт
біт1но1
бі2т1н
1бів
бірно3ї
бі2р1н
бір1но
бі1ї
3бі1гу
бі1же
1бім
3бід
3бі3й2мав
бій1м
бій1ма
бій1д2
бій2ш1л
б1г
бут1нь2о3
бу2т1н
бу1ті
бу1ро1
бу1ря
будо1во3
бу1до
бу1дж
без1л
3бел
бераль1но3
бе1ра
бера2ль
бераль1н
3бертан
бе2рт
бер1та
1беж
б1м
бме4жу3є
б1меж
бме1жу
бмеж3ує.
1би.
би1с
би1но1
би1в1к
би2в2ч
2би1я2
1бим
1биш
2б1к
бко1
бд2
б1де
2б1х
бхідно3ї
б1хі
бхі2д1н
бхід1но
б1є2д
б1п
2б1ш
б1ч
бчас1
1за1
заці1ї
за1ц
за1ці
заці3є1
зас2
залежно3ї
за1ле
зале2ж1н
залеж1но
3заю
за3т
зан1ті3ї
за2нт
зан1ті2
зав4да2н1н
за2в1д
зав1да
зар2
зарод4
за1ро
заро3дже
зарод1ж
за3г2
3загаль1не
зага2ль
загаль1н
за3д2
за4д.
зай2
за2йд2
запов4не3
за1п
запо1
запо2в1н
запо3внен1н
заповнен4
запо3вне1ни
2зб
з2ба1г
3зброєн1ні
з4броєн1н
збро1є
збро1єн
3з2броє1ни
збір1но3
збі2р1н
збу1
3збек
з1з
з2ц
з1с
1зо
зо1бо
зо1с
зо1та
зот1в
зоно1ю
зо1но
зовано3ї
зо1ва
зова1но
зо1кр
зо1п
з1л2ю
з1лу
1зю
з1т
з3тл
1зна4юс
1зна2н1н
3знавай
зна1ва
1зна1єш
3знайтесь1
зна2й3т
знай3те
знайш3ли
знай2шл
2з1ню
1зні1ші
з1ні
1зні1ше
2з1ну
зне3ви1
з1не
зне3в2
зневин2
з1нь
з1нь2о1
зни1це1
з1ни
3з2ваном
зва1но
1з2волу
зво1л
3зволь1н
зво2ль
3з2воляла
з4воля1л
3зволяло.
3з2волила
зволи1л
1зві.
з2віс
звіл1л
3з2віл1ля
з1ву.
1зв2е.
зве1с
з2вич
з1ви
3звичайно1г
зви1ча
звичай1н
звичай1но
3звичай1ні
3звичай1не
зробля3є
зро1бл2
зро1бля
зро4стан
зро1ст
3з2рюван
з1р2ю
зрю1в
3з2ріван
зрі1ва
3з2ріває.
1з2ріє.
з1ря
1зі
зі1з
зі1с
зі1л
зіт2
зі3т1н
зі1тр
зірко1
зір1к
зі3г
зі3м1к2
зі1д2
зій2
зі1йд2
зі1йш
зг2
3згада1но
зга1да
3згаданих
згада1ни
згаду3є
зга1ду
згод3ж
3зго3дже1ни
згод4же
з1гл
з3гн
з2гра
з1гр
1зу
зу1с
зу1ті
1зе
зе1ю
зента1ці3
зе2нт
зен1та
зен1та1ц
3зерах
зе1ра
3зером
зе1ро
зер1ву
зе1ї
зь1
зькос1
2зьком
зя3ви
1зям
1зях
зм2
змо2г1л
з1мо
змо1г
з1м1н
зміс3то
змі3сту
змі2я.
змі1я
з1ме2ж1
1зи
зиціє1
зи1ці
зи1ді1
з1к
зко1с
зко3ш
зкри1ва3
3з2добл2
здо3б2
зд1в
здіяль1но3
з1ді
зді1я
здія1л
здія2ль
здіяль1н
з2дуж
з1ду
з1дя
з1х
з1є
з2й
з1п
зпіз1
зпу1
з1ш
з1ча
2ц.
1ца
царсько4
ца2р1с
царі1ї
ца1рі
ц1ц
1цю
2ц2т2в.
ц1твам
ц1н
цнос1
ц1но
ц2в
1ці
ці3а
ціл1л
ці1ює
3ціню1ю
ці1ню
3цінюван
ціню1в
3цінює
3цінит
ці1ни
3цін1к
цінко1
ційно3ї
цій3н
цій1но
цузько3
цузь1
цу1р
цу1к
1це
це1ї
2ць1
4ць2к.
цько1
цько4ю
1ця
1ци
цистсько3
цис2т1с
цис1ті
2ц1д
2с.
1са
3са3до
сад1жу
1сб
сцево3ю
с1це
сце1во
сцево3ї
с1с
с1сі1
1со
со1б
3собов
3собливо2с3
собл2
собли1во
3собливо3ї
3собливо1г
3собливі1с3т2ю
собли1ві2
3собливий3
собли1ви
3собин
со1би
сос2
со1ст
со1сна
сос1н
со1с1ни
со1та
со1тв
со3т2к2
со1ні1
софі1ю
со1фі
со1й2
со1п
со1ч
с1ла.
3слаблен1н
с4ла1бле
сла1б
слабл2
с1ла1ну
с1лою
с1ло1г
с1л2ю
2с1лі.
1слу
2с1лу.
с1ле
сля1
сля1ці1
сля1ц
с1ли.
сю1
4сю2д1н
4сюджує
сю1дж
4сюдже1ни
1сюди1л
сю1ди
1сюдит
2с2т.
1стас
1ста2л.
1ста1лу
3сталис
ста1ли
3статочний2
с4таточ1ни
ста1т
стато2ч1н
1ста1на
3стано2в.
ста1но
3стано1ва
3стано1вок
стано1во
3становк
2с1тан1ню
ста2н1н
2стан1ні
3станки
с4тан1к
1ста2в1с
1стай
3с4та1п
1сто.
1сто1л
сто3рі4
1сто1ко
1сто1кі
1сточ
с2т2л
2с2т2в.
1стві
1ству
2с2т2р.
4строно1мі
стро1но
ст3ро1во
ст3ро1ву
1стру
стря1
1стри
с1ті1ї
с1ту1ют
1сту1ю1ч
3стувал
сту1в
3стува1т
3стував
1стує
1стуй
2стеля.
сте1ля
3сте3ма.
сте1ма
3стемах
с1те1мо1
1сте1му
3стечка
сте2ч1к
3стечку
2с2ть
3стинські
сти2н1с
3стинських
4сти1но
4стин1к
с4ти1во
3стиво1сті
3стия2н.
сти1я
3стия1на
3стиянства
стия2н1с
3стиянсь3ка
3стиянської
стиянсько4
3стиянськом
3стиянських
3стия1ни
1стиш
с1тич
3стково.
с2т1к
стко1во
3сткової
с1н
3снащен1н
с2на1щ
3снаще1ні
3снаще1ни
3с2нова.
с1но
сно1ва
3с2но3в2но3ї
сно2в1н
снов1но
3с2но3в2ну
3с2но3в2не
3сно3в2ки
с2нювал
с1ню
сню1в
3снюва1ло
3снювали.
снюва1ли
сні1ї
с1ні
3сніжна
сні2ж1н
3сніж1но
с3ну.
с1ну
сни1цт
с1ни
3сво
сво2єм
сво1є
3сві1та
3сві1то
3світлен1н
сві2т1л
світ1ле
3сві1ти
с1ві2д.
с1ві1ду
3свідчений2
свід1ч
свід1че
свідче1ни
с2ви
1сі
сі1с
сіл1л
3сін
сійсько3
сій1сь
сій1но1
сій3н
с2у
3су.
су1б
1сул
су1ті
сумо1ю
су1мо
судо1во3
су1до
су1х
1суй
су1п
су1ч
1с2е.
1сец
се1ст
сес1в
се1сп
с2ел
1сет
3с2ен
се4в2д
сері1ї
се1рі
4сере2до
се1ре
сере2д3н
семнос3
сем1н
сем1но
1сек
2сь2к.
ськос1
ськово3ю
сько1во
1с2я
ся3ть1м
ся2ть
ся1в
сяг1ла
ся1гло
2ся1к
с2м
3с1ма
1си
3сис
3сит
си2г1н
си1г
си1мі1
сич1но1
си2ч1н
ск2
4ска1ют
1ска1т
1скає.
1скай
с1ко1г
3складнен1н
скла2д1н
склад1не
с3кн
1сква
1скво1
1скві
1скву
1ск2ви
3скраво.
скра1во
с1кус
1скучо
3скучим
ску1чи
1ским
1ских
с1кий2
с1д
с2х
с3ха
схо1
східно3ю
с1хі
схі2д1н
схід1но
с3ху
спа1ст
спа1ні1
3спадкував
спад1к
спадку1в
спози1ці3
спо1
с3поз
спо1зи
1с2по1ну
3спода.
спо1да
3спода2р.
3сподарсь3ка
с3пода2р1с
3сподарське
3спода1р2ю
3спо3да2р1н
3спода1рі2
3спода1ре
3спода1ря
3сподам
1спо1до
1спо2д1н
1спо1ді
1сп2о1ду
1спо2дь
1спо1ди
1спр
сприй3
3спільства
спі2ль
спіль1с
3спіль1стві
3спіль1ні
спіль1н
3спільних
спіль1ни
3спі1хом
спі1хо
3спішно1г
спі2ш1н
спіш1но
3спіш1ні
3спішни2м.
спіш1ни
3спішних
3спішний2
спу1
3спубліка.
спу1бл2
спублі1ка
3с4педицію
спе1ди
спеди1ці
спи3ско
списк2
сш1т
о1а1
о1ба
о3бо1л
об1ло
обл2
об1лі
об1лу
об3р2ю
об1ря
обрита1ні3
о1бри
обри1та
обі3д2н
о3бід
о1бу
о1би
о3бираю
оби1р
о3бирав
о3бира1єт
об1є
об’1
о2з1б
оз1л
о3з2на1че
озна1ч
оз1в
оз2ву
оз1р
3о3з2рюван
оз1р2ю
озрю1в
о1зі1
оз1г2
озем1но3
о1зе
озем1н
озь2
оз1ьк
оз1ж
оз1м2
оз1д
оз1ч
оз’1
о1ц
о2цт
оц3твом
оц1тві
оціаль1но3
о1ці
оці3а
оціа2ль
оціаль1н
оці1ї
осад1ж
о1са
ос1ло.
ос1ли
ос3танням
оста2н1н
остан1ня
о1ст2ю
о1ств
ос1тів
о4сту.
осту1па3
о1стем
о2с1тис
оснос1
ос1н
ос1но
о1с2них
ос1ни
о3сві1ті
о3сві1до
осі1ю
о1сі
осі1є1ю
осуд1ж
ос2у
о3сер
о2сь
ос1ф
о3ска
оск2
ос1ки.
о1с2х
о1о
оо1бр
оос1
оо2ди2н1ц
оо1ди
оо1ч
о1л
о3ло
оло2с2т
олос3ті
олос3те
ологі3ю
оло1г
оло1гі
ол1ла
ол1лі
оліс3та
о3лім
олуд2
о3ле
оле3глим
оль1но1
о2ль
оль1н
оля1ці1
оля1ц
о1юз
о1юс
о1ю1ю
о1ю1в
о1юр
о1ює
ота1ці1
о1та1ц
о1то
отоко3ю
ото1ко
о2т1л
о3т2ня.
о2т1н
от1ня
о3тво3рі
о3тво1ре
отворчо3
отвор1ч
от1ру
о3т2рує
отря3ст
о3т2рима1ні
отри1ма
о1ті
о1ту
о1те
о1ти
оти1ст
о2т1к2
о3т2кн
о2т1ч
о1на
она1ці1
о1на1ц
она2с
онструкці3ю
о2н1с
он1стру
онстру2к1ц
онструк1ці
онсько4ї
онсько3
оно1ї
о1но
он1но1
он1н
оніє1
о1ні
оне3цьк
о1не
оне2ць2
онько1
онь1к
о1н1ді
он1д
о1н1ди
о1н1ш
о1н1ч
о1ва
оваго1
ова1г
ов1ба
ов3сю1
о2вс
ов1ст
о1во
о3воч
ов1та
о2вт
ов1то
ов1ті
ов1ту
ов1те
ов1ти
ов1ва
о1вр
о1ві
овізі2я
ові1зі
ові1тр
ові1ре
овіч1но3
ові2ч1н
ов1г
о1в2ге
о1ву
о1ве
ове1ст
о1вя
ов1жи
о1в2м
ови3н4нос3
о1ви
овин1н
овин1но
ов1ка
о3вколи
овко1л
ов1кл
ов1ку
ов1ки
о2в1д
о2вп
ов1по1
ов1пе
ов1чи
о1в’
овщи1но3
ов1щ
о1ра
о1р1це
ор1ц
орсько3
о2р1с
о1ро
орон3н
оро3дже1на
оро3джен1н
ород3же1ні
оро3дже1ни
орт1но1
о2рт
ор2т1н
орно1ї
о2р1н
ор1но
ор1в
о3рі
о1ру
о1ре
оре1ї
о3рег
орейсько3
орей1сь
о1ря
о1ри
ори3стал
ори4сто
орис3ти
о1і
о1їз
ої1з1му
оїзм2
о1їс
о1їл
о1г
огорі3ї
ого3рі
ого3дж
ог1лис
огі3є1
о1гі
о3гм
о1е
о3ети.
о2е1ти
ое3н
о1я
о2я.
оя1ва.
оя3ви2в.
оя2ви
оя1к
о1жо
ожно1с
о2ж1н
ож1но
ожньо3ї
ож1нь2о
о1жу
о1же
ожива3є
ожи1ва
о3фо
о3фі1с
о1фі
о3мо1с
о1мо
омо3гла
омо2гл
омо1г
омо3гло.
о1м1т
омно1ї
ом1н
ом1но
о1мі
омісі3ю
